Utah, session 2026, SB28.
Section 1. Section 17-60-104 is amended to read:17-60-104. Classification of counties.(1)A county that exists on May 6, 2026, shall retain the county's classification as it exists on May 6, 2026, until the county's classification is changed in accordance with Section 17-60-105.(1)(2)EachA county formed after May 6, 2026, in accordance with Title 17, Chapter 3, Creating New Counties, shall be classified according to the county's population, as described in Subsection (3), until the county's classification is changed in accordance with Section 17-60-105.(2)(3)(a)A county with a population of 1,150,000 or more is a county of the first class.(b)A county with a population of 260,000 or more but less than 1,150,000 is a county of the second class.(c)A county with a population of 40,000 or more but less than 260,000 is a county of the third class.(d)A county with a population of 12,000 or more but less than 40,000 is a county of the fourth class.(e)A county with a population of 5,000 or more but less than 12,000 is a county of the fifth class.(f)A county with a population less than 5,000 is a county of the sixth class.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 17-60-105 is amended to read:17-60-105. Change of class of county.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Annual revenue" means the total combined amount of taxes a county collects in a calendar year from:(i)property taxes and fees in lieu of property taxes; and(ii)the county's distribution of sales and use taxes.(b)"Population" means, for each county:(i)the most recent population estimate by the Utah Population Commission created in Section 63C-20-103; or(ii)the census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census, if the census or census estimate is more recent than the Utah Population Commission's population estimate.(2)Each county shall retain the county's classification under Section 17-60-104 until changed as provided inin accordance with this section.(2)The lieutenant governor shall monitor the population figure for each county as shown on:(a)the estimate of the Utah Population Committee created in Section 63C-20-103; or(b)if the Utah Population Committee estimate is not available, the census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census.(3)Before December 31, 2026, and before December 31 every five years after 2026, the Utah Population Commission and the State Tax Commission shall issue a joint letter to the lieutenant governor that:(a)includes the average population and average annual revenue of each county classification for the year that immediately precedes the year the joint letter is issued; and(b)identifies each county that:(i)(A)has a population that is 200% greater than the average population of the county's current classification; and(B)has an annual revenue that is 200% greater than the average annual revenue of the county's current classification; or(ii)(A)has a population that is 50% less than the average population of the county's current classification; and(B)has an annual revenue that is 50% less than the average annual revenue of the county's current classification.(3)(4)After July 1, 2021, if the applicable population figure under Subsection (2) indicates that a county's population has increased beyond the limit for the county's current class, After the lieutenant governor receives the letter described in Subsection (3), the lieutenant governor shall:(a)prepare a certificate indicating the class in which the county belongs based on the increased population figure; andthat:(i)except for a county of the first class under Section 17-50-501, the classification of a county with the characteristics described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) is changed to the next highest county classification; and(ii)except for a county of the sixth class under Section 17-50-501, the classification of a county with the characteristics described in Subsection (3)(b)(ii) is changed to the next lowest county classification; and(b)within 10 days after preparing the certificate, deliver a copy of the certificate to the county legislative body and, if the county has an executive that is separate from the legislative body, the executive of the county whose class was changed.(4)(5)A county's change in class is effective on the date of the lieutenant governor's certificate under Subsection (3)(4).

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.